Louisiana, session 2026, HB652.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:421(B)(5) through (15), (C), and (E)(4) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 56:421(B)(16) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§421. Oyster Task Force
* * *
B. The task force shall be composed as follows:
* * *
(5) One member appointed by the commissioner of the Department of
Agriculture and Forestry.
(5) (6) Four members appointed by the Louisiana Oyster Dealers and
Growers Association. Two members appointed under the provisions of this
Paragraph shall be selected at-large. Of the other two members, one shall be from
Jefferson Parish and one shall be selected from either Lafourche or Terrebonne
Parish.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 652 ENROLLED
(6) (7) Two members appointed by the Plaquemines Oyster Association.
(7) (8) One member appointed by the Terrebonne Oyster Association.
(8) (9) One member appointed by the Cameron Parish police jury who is a
properly licensed oyster harvester with documented commercial landings of oysters
from Calcasieu Lake, or a properly licensed seafood dealer with documented
commercial purchases of oysters from Calcasieu Lake during the current or
preceding license year of appointment as per records of the Department of Wildlife
and Fisheries.
(9) (10) One member appointed by the Southwest Pass Oyster Leaseholder
Association.
(10) (11) Two members appointed by the United Commercial Fisherman's
Association.
(11) (12) One member appointed by the Delta Commercial Fisherman's
organization.
(12) (13) One member who has voting authority and is an oyster grower
appointed by the president of the Louisiana Farm Bureau Federation.
(13) (14) One member appointed by the Louisiana Oyster Aquaculture
Association.
(14) (15) One member appointed by the executive director of the Coastal
Protection and Restoration Authority.
(15) (16) One member appointed by the Louisiana Oystermen Association.
C. The members appointed under the provisions of Paragraphs (B)(1)
through (4) (5) and (14) (16) of this Section shall be nonvoting members. However,
they shall be considered members of the task force for determination of the number
of members necessary for a quorum and for establishing the presence of a quorum.
* * *
E. The task force is hereby charged with the responsibility to do the
following:
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 652 ENROLLED
(4) Make recommendations with respect to issues pertaining to the oyster
industry and oyster production to the various state agencies charged with
responsibility for differing elements of the oyster industry in this state, including the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries, the Department of Agriculture and Forestry,
the Department of Conservation and Energy, the Coastal Protection and Restoration
Authority Board, the Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority, the Louisiana
Department of Health, the governor's executive assistant for coastal activities, and
the legislature.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.